tr: Dahil edilen malzemeler: Tam kit (tüm materyaller dahil); Kalıp + kumaş; Kalıp + kasnak/çerçeve; Kalıp + iğneler; Kalıp + iplik; Yalnızca kalıp; Diğer
hr-HR: Uključeni materijali: Puni komplet (svi materijali uključeni); Kroj + tkanina; Kroj + obruč/okvir; Kroj + igle; Kroj + konac; Samo kroj; Ostalo
zh-TW: 隨附材料: 全套 (包含所有材料); 紙型 + 布料; 紙型 + 繡框; 紙型 + 針; 紙型 + 繡線; 僅紙型; 其他
hu: Mellékelt anyagok: Teljes készlet (minden alapanyagot tartalmaz); Minta + anyag; Minta + hímzőráma/keret; Minta + tűk; Minta + cérna/hímzőfonal; Csak minta; Egyéb
da: Medfølgende materialer: Komplet sæt (alle materialer medfølger); Mønster + stof; Mønster + broderiring/ramme; Mønster + nåle; Mønster + tråd/broderigarn; Kun mønster; Andet
th: วัสดุที่รวมอยู่: ชุดเครื่องมือครบชุด (รวมวัสดุทั้งหมด); แพทเทิร์น + ผ้า; แพทเทิร์น + สะดึง/กรอบ; แพทเทิร์น + เข็ม; แพทเทิร์น + ด้าย/ไหม; แพทเทิร์นอย่างเดียว; อื่นๆ
en: Included materials: Full kit (all materials included); Pattern + fabric; Pattern + hoop/frame; Pattern + needles; Pattern + thread/floss; Pattern only; Other
pt-BR: Materiais incluídos: Kit completo (todos os materiais incluídos); Molde + tecido; Molde + bastidor/moldura; Molde + agulhas; Molde + linha/fio; Apenas molde; Outros
it: Materiali inclusi: Kit completo (tutti i materiali inclusi); Modello + tessuto; Modello + telaio/cornice; Modello + aghi; Modello + filo/cotone; Solo modello; Altro
es: Materiales incluidos: Kit completo (todos los materiales incluidos); Patrón + tela; Patrón + bastidor/marco; Patrón + agujas; Patrón + hilo; Solo patrón; Otro
el: Περιλαμβανόμενα υλικά: Πλήρες κιτ (περιλαμβάνονται όλα τα υλικά); Πατρόν + ύφασμα; Πατρόν + τελάρο/πλαίσιο; Πατρόν + βελόνες; Πατρόν + κλωστή/νήμα; Μόνο πατρόν; Άλλο
sv: Inkluderat material: Komplett kit (alla material ingår); Mönster + tyg; Mönster + båge/ram; Mönster + nålar; Mönster + tråd/garn; Endast mönster; Övrigt
sl-SI: Vključeni materiali: Polni komplet (vsi materiali so priloženi); Vzorec + blago; Vzorec + obroč/okvir; Kroj in igle; Vzorec + sukanec/nit; Samo vzorec; Drugo
ko: 포함된 재료: 풀 키트(모든 재료 포함); 패턴 + 패브릭; 패턴 + 후프/프레임; 패턴 + 바늘; 패턴 + 실/자수실; 패턴 전용; 기타
cs: Zahrnuté materiály: Kompletní sada (včetně všech materiálů); Vzor + látka; Vzor + obruč/rám; Vzor + jehly; Vzor + nit/příze; Pouze vzor; Jiné
ja: 付属素材: フルキット (すべての材料を含む); パターン＋生地; パターン＋フープ/フレーム; パターン＋針; パターン＋糸/刺繍糸; パターンのみ; その他
vi: Vật liệu đi kèm: Trọn bộ (bao gồm tất cả vật liệu); Mẫu rập + vải; Mẫu rập + vòng/khung thêu; Mẫu rập + kim; Mẫu rập + chỉ; Chỉ mẫu rập; Khác
zh-CN: 包含材料: 完整套件（含所有材料）; 图纸 + 面料; 图纸 + 绣绷/绣架; 图纸 + 绣花针; 图纸 + 绣线; 仅图纸; 其他
ru: Материалы в комплекте: Полный набор (все материалы включены); Выкройка + ткань; Схема + пяльцы/рамка; Схема/выкройка + иглы; Схема/выкройка + нитки/мулине; Только схема/выкройка; Другое
fr: Matériel inclus: Kit complet (tous matériaux inclus); Patron + tissu; Patron + tambour/cadre; Patron + aiguilles; Patron + fil; Patron uniquement; Autre
fi: Mukana toimitetut materiaalit: Täydellinen pakkaus (sisältää kaikki materiaalit); Kaava ja kangas; Kaava ja kehys; Kaava ja neulat; Kaava ja lanka; Vain kaava; Muu
pl: Dołączone materiały: Pełny zestaw (zawiera wszystkie materiały); Wzór + materiał; Wzór + tamborek/ramka; Wzór + igły; Wzór + nici/mulina; Tylko wzór; Inne
de: Enthaltene Materialien: Vollständiges Paket (alle Materialien inbegriffen); Muster + Stoff; Muster + Stickrahmen/Rahmen; Muster + Nadeln; Muster + Faden/Garn; Nur Muster; Sonstige
pt-PT: Materiais incluídos: Kit completo (todos os materiais incluídos); Molde + tecido; Molde + bastidor/armação; Molde + agulhas; Molde + linhas/fios; Apenas molde; Outro
bg-BG: Включени материали: Пълен комплект (включени са всички материали); Шаблон + плат; Шаблон + гергеф/рамка; Шаблон + игли; Шаблон + конци/прежда; Само шаблон; Други
nl: Meegeleverde materialen: Volledige kit (alle materialen inbegrepen); Patroon + stof; Patroon + borduurring/raam; Patroon + naalden; Patroon + garen; Alleen patroon; Overige
lt-LT: Įtrauktos medžiagos: Pilnas rinkinys (įtrauktos visos medžiagos); Raštas + audinys; Raštas + lankelis / rėmas; Raštas + adatos; Raštas + siūlai; Tik raštas; Kita
nb: Inkluderte materialer: Komplett sett (alle materialer inkludert); Mønster + stoff; Mønster + broderiring/ramme; Mønster + nåler; Mønster + tråd/garn; Kun mønster; Annet
ro-RO: Materiale incluse: Kit complet (toate materialele incluse); Model + material textil; Model + gherghef/ramă; Model + ace; Model + ață/fir; Doar model; Altele
sk-SK: Zahrnuté materiály: Kompletná súprava (vrátane všetkých materiálov); Vzor + látka; Vzor + obruč/rám; Vzor + ihly; Vzor + niť/bavlnka; Iba vzor; Iné